Washington statutes.
RCW 35.73.020

Estimates—Intention—Property included—Resolution.

Before establishing a grade for property or providing for the fill of property, the city must adopt a resolution declaring its intention to do so.

The resolution shall:

(1) Describe the property proposed to be improved by the fill,

(2) State the estimated cost of making the improvement,

(3) State that the cost thereof is to be assessed against the property improved thereby, and

(4) Fix a time not less than thirty days after the first publication of the resolution within which protests against the proposed improvement may be filed with the city clerk.

The resolution may include as many separate parcels of property as may seem desirable whether or not they are contiguous so long as they lie in the same general neighborhood and may be included conveniently in one local improvement district.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.73.020. Prior: 1907 c 243 s 2, part; RRS s 9427, part.]